Alaska, session 34, HB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. AS 11.56.740(a) is amended to read: 07 (a) A person commits the crime of violating a protective order if the person is 08 subject to a protective order 09 (1) issued, filed, or recognized under AS 18.66 and containing a 10 provision listed in AS 18.66.100(c)(1) - (7) and knowingly commits or attempts to 11 commit an act with reckless disregard that the act violates or would violate a provision 12 of the protective order; 13 (2) issued or recognized under AS 18.65.850, 18.65.855, 18.65.860, or 14 18.65.867 and knowingly commits or attempts to commit an act that violates or would 01 violate a provision listed in AS 18.65.850(c)(1) - (3); [OR] 02 (3) issued under AS 13.26.450 - 13.26.460 and knowingly commits or 03 attempts to commit an act with reckless disregard that the act violates or would violate 04 a provision of the protective order; or 05 (4) issued under AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899 and knowingly commits 06 or attempts to commit an act that violates or would violate a provision listed in 07 AS 18.65.875(c). 08 * Sec. 2. AS 11.56.740(c) is amended to read: 09 (c) In this section, "protective order" means an order issued, filed, or 10 recognized under AS 13.26.450 - 13.26.460, AS 18.65.850 - 18.65.899 [AS 18.65.850 11 - 18.65.870], or AS 18.66.100 - 18.66.180. 12 * Sec. 3. AS 13.26.460 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 13 (i) Attorney fees may not be awarded against a petitioner or protected person 14 seeking a protective order under AS 13.26.450, making an application under 15 AS 13.26.455, or requesting modification of a protective order under (a) of this 16 section. 17 * Sec. 4. AS 18.65.530(a) is amended to read: 18 (a) Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this section, a peace officer, with or 19 without a warrant, shall arrest a person if the officer has probable cause to believe the 20 person has, either in or outside the presence of the officer, within the previous 12 21 hours, 22 (1) committed domestic violence, except an offense under 23 AS 11.41.100 - 11.41.130, whether the crime is a felony or a misdemeanor; 24 (2) committed the crime of violating a protective order in violation of 25 AS 11.56.740(a)(1), [OR] (2), or (4); 26 (3) violated a condition of release imposed under AS 12.30.016(e) or 27 (f) or 12.30.027. 28 * Sec. 5. AS 18.65.540(a) is amended to read: 29 (a) The Department of Public Safety shall maintain a central registry of 30 protective orders issued by or filed with a court of this state under AS 13.26.450 - 31 13.26.460, AS 18.65.850 - 18.65.899 [AS 18.65.850 - 18.65.870], or AS 18.66.100 - 01 18.66.180. The registry must include, for each protective order, the names of the 02 petitioner and respondent, their dates of birth, and the conditions and duration of the 03 order. The registry shall retain a record of the protective order after it has expired. 04 * Sec. 6. AS 18.65.540(b) is amended to read: 05 (b) A peace officer receiving a protective order from a court under 06 AS 13.26.450, 13.26.455, AS 18.65.850 - 18.65.855, 18.65.875, 18.65.877, or 07 AS 18.66.100 - 18.66.180, a modified order issued under AS 13.26.460, 08 AS 18.65.860, 18.65.880, or AS 18.66.120, or an order dismissing a protective order 09 shall take reasonable steps to ensure that the order, modified order, or dismissal is 10 entered into the central registry within 24 hours after being received. 11 * Sec. 7. AS 18.65.850(f) is amended to read: 12 (f) Within 30 days before, or within 60 days after, the expiration of a 13 protective order issued or extended under this section, a petitioner may petition the 14 court for an extension of the protective order. The court shall schedule a hearing and 15 provide at least 10 days' notice to the respondent of the hearing and of the respondent's 16 right to appear and be heard, either in person or through an attorney. If the court finds 17 that an extension of the provisions of the order is necessary to protect the petitioner 18 from stalking or sexual assault, regardless of whether the respondent appears at the 19 hearing, the court may extend the provisions of the order. An extension granted under 20 this subsection is effective for at least one year and not more than five years unless 21 earlier dissolved by court order. If the court grants an extension before the protective 22 order expires, the extension takes effect on the day the protective order would have 23 expired. 24 * Sec. 8. AS 18.65.865 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 25 (e) Attorney fees may not be awarded against a petitioner seeking a protective 26 order under AS 18.65.850 - 18.65.870. 27 * Sec. 9. AS 18.65 is amended by adding new sections to read: 28 Article 12A. Victim Counseling Center Protective Orders. 29 Sec. 18.65.875. Protective orders; eligible petitioners; relief. (a) An 30 employer that operates a victim counseling center may file a petition in the district or 31 superior court for a protective order against an individual who the employer 01 reasonably believes 02 (1) committed an act of violence against the employer or an employee 03 that occurred at the employer's victim counseling center; or 04 (2) made a threat of violence against the employer or an employee that 05 can reasonably be construed as a threat that may be carried out at the employer's 06 victim counseling center. 07 (b) When a petition for a protective order is filed, the court shall schedule a 08 hearing and provide at least 10 days' notice to the respondent of the hearing and of the 09 respondent's right to appear and be heard, either in person or through an attorney. If 10 the court finds by a preponderance of evidence that the respondent has committed an 11 act of violence against the employer or an employee at the employer's victim 12 counseling center, or that the respondent made a threat of violence against the 13 employer or an employee that may reasonably be construed as a threat that may be 14 carried out at the employer's victim counseling center, regardless of whether the 15 respondent appears at the hearing, the court may order any relief available under (c) of 16 this section. The provisions of a protective order issued under this section are effective 17 for six months unless earlier dissolved by the court. 18 (c) A protective order issued under this section may 19 (1) prohibit the respondent from making a threat to commit or 20 committing violence; 21 (2) prohibit the respondent from telephoning, contacting, or otherwise 22 communicating directly or indirectly with the petitioner; 23 (3) direct the respondent to stay away from the petitioner's victim 24 counseling center, or space adjacent to the petitioner's victim counseling center, or any 25 specified place frequented by the petitioner, during the normal course of the 26 petitioner's business; however, if the respondent is an employee at the petitioner's 27 victim counseling center, the court may order the respondent to stay away from the 28 victim counseling center only if the respondent has been provided actual notice of the 29 opportunity to appear and be heard on the petition; 30 (4) order other relief the court determines to be necessary to protect the 31 petitioner's victim counseling center, except that the court may not order a respondent 01 to surrender a firearm unless a firearm was used in the act of violence at the victim 02 counseling center or in the threat of violence at the victim counseling center. 03 (d) If the court issues a protective order under this section, the court shall 04 (1) make reasonable efforts to ensure that the order is understood by 05 the petitioner and the respondent; and 06 (2) have the order delivered to the appropriate local law enforcement 07 agency for expedited service and entry into the central registry of protective orders 08 under AS 18.65.540. 09 (e) A court may not deny a petition for a protective order solely because of a 10 lapse of time between an act of violence or a threat of violence and the filing of the 11 petition. 12 Sec. 18.65.877. Victim counseling center ex parte protective orders. An 13 employer who may file a petition for a protective order against an individual under 14 AS 18.65.875 may file a petition for an ex parte protective order against the 15 individual. If the court finds that the petition establishes probable cause that an act of 16 violence against the employer or an employee occurred at the employer's victim 17 counseling center, or that the respondent made a threat of violence against the 18 employer or an employee that may reasonably be construed as a threat that may be 19 carried out at the employer's victim counseling center, that it is necessary to protect 20 the employer from further violence, and that the petitioner has certified to the court in 21 writing the efforts, if any, that have been made to provide notice to the respondent, the 22 court shall ex parte and without notice to the respondent issue a protective order. An 23 ex parte protective order under this section may grant the protection allowed by 24 AS 18.65.875(c). An ex parte protective order expires 20 days after it is issued unless 25 dissolved earlier by the court at the request of either the petitioner or the respondent 26 after notice and, if requested, a hearing. If the court issues an ex parte protective order, 27 the court shall have the order delivered to the appropriate law enforcement agency for 28 expedited service and entry into the central registry of protective orders under 29 AS 18.65.540. 30 Sec. 18.65.880. Modification of a victim counseling center protective order. 31 (a) Either the petitioner or the respondent may request modification of a protective 01 order issued under AS 18.65.875 or 18.65.877. If a request is made for modification of 02 (1) a protective order after notice and hearing under AS 18.65.875, the 03 court shall schedule a hearing within 20 days after the date the request is made, except 04 that if the court finds that the request is meritless on its face, the court may deny the 05 request without further hearing; or 06 (2) an ex parte protective order under AS 18.65.877, the court shall 07 schedule a hearing on three days' notice or on shorter notice as the court may 08 prescribe. 09 (b) If a request for a modification is made under this section and the 10 respondent raises an issue not raised by the petitioner, the court may allow the 11 petitioner additional time to respond. 12 (c) If the court modifies a protective order under this section, the court shall 13 issue a modified order and shall 14 (1) make reasonable efforts to ensure that the order is understood by 15 the petitioner and the respondent; and 16 (2) have the order delivered to the appropriate local law enforcement 17 agency for expedited service and for entry into the central registry of protective orders 18 under AS 18.65.540. 19 Sec. 18.65.885. Specific protective orders. (a) If a respondent in a protective 20 order issued under AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.880 is prohibited from communicating with 21 the petitioner, excluded from the petitioner's victim counseling center or space 22 adjacent to the petitioner's victim counseling center, or ordered to stay away from the 23 petitioner as provided in AS 18.65.875(c)(2) - (4), an invitation by the petitioner to 24 communicate, enter the petitioner's victim counseling center, or have other prohibited 25 contact with the petitioner does not waive or nullify any provision in a protective 26 order. 27 (b) A court may not order parties into mediation or refer them to mediation for 28 resolution of the issues arising from a petition for a protective order under 29 AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899. 30 (c) In addition to other required information contained in a protective order, 31 the order must include in boldface type the following statements: 01 (1) "Violation of this order may be a misdemeanor, punishable by up 02 to one year of incarceration and up to a $25,000 fine"; 03 (2) "If you are ordered to have no contact with the petitioner or to stay 04 away from the petitioner's victim counseling center or other place designated by the 05 court, an invitation by the petitioner to have the prohibited contact or to be present at 06 or enter the victim counseling center or other place does not in any way invalidate or 07 nullify the order." 08 (d) A protective order issued under AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899 is in addition to 09 and not in place of any other civil or criminal remedy. A petitioner is not barred from 10 seeking an order under AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899 because of the existence of another 11 civil action between the petitioner and the respondent. 12 Sec. 18.65.890. Forms for petitions and orders; fees. (a) The Alaska Court 13 System shall prepare forms for petitions, protective orders, and instructions for their 14 use by an employer seeking a protective order under AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899. The 15 forms must conform to the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, except that information 16 on the forms may be filled in by legible handwriting. 17 (b) In addition to other information required, a petition for a protective order 18 must include a statement of pending civil or criminal actions involving the petitioner 19 or the respondent. While a protective order is in effect or a petition for a protective 20 order is pending, both the petitioner and the respondent have a continuing duty to 21 inform the court of pending civil or criminal actions involving the petitioner or the 22 respondent. 23 (c) The office of the clerk of each superior and district court shall make 24 available to the public the forms a person seeking a protective order under 25 AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899 may need and instructions for the use of the forms. The 26 clerk shall provide assistance in completing the forms and filing the forms. 27 (d) Filing fees may not be charged in any action seeking only the relief 28 provided in AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899. 29 (e) Attorney fees may not be awarded against a petitioner seeking a protective 30 order under AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899. 31 Sec. 18.65.895. Service of process. (a) Unless, on the record in court, the 01 respondent has already been provided a copy of the court's order, process issued under 02 AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899 shall be promptly served and executed. If process is to be 03 served on a respondent believed to be present or residing in a municipality, as defined 04 in AS 29.71.800, or in an unincorporated community, process shall be served by a 05 peace officer of that municipality or unincorporated community who has jurisdiction 06 within the area of service. If a peace officer of the municipality or unincorporated 07 community who has jurisdiction is not available, a superior court, district court, or 08 magistrate may designate any other peace officer to serve and execute process. A state 09 peace officer shall serve process in any area that is not within the jurisdiction of a 10 peace officer of a municipality or unincorporated community. A peace officer shall 11 use every reasonable means to serve process issued under AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899. 12 A judge may not order a peace officer to serve a petition that has been denied by the 13 court. 14 (b) Service of process under (a) of this section does not preclude a petitioner 15 from using any other available means to serve process issued under AS 18.65.875 - 16 18.65.899. 17 (c) Fees for service of process may not be charged in a proceeding seeking 18 only the relief provided in AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899. 19 Sec. 18.65.897. Civil liability. (a) A person may not bring a civil action for 20 damages against the state, its officers, agents, or employees, or a law enforcement 21 agency, its officers, agents, or employees for any failure to comply with the provisions 22 of AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899. 23 (b) A person may not bring a civil action for damages against an employer for 24 seeking or failing to seek a protective order unless an employer seeks a protective 25 order for an illegitimate purpose. 26 Sec. 18.65.899. Definitions. In AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899, 27 (1) "course of conduct" has the meaning given in AS 11.41.270(b); 28 (2) "employee" means an individual employed by an employer but 29 does not include an individual employed in the domestic service of any person; 30 (3) "employer" means a person who employs one or more other 31 persons; 01 (4) "threat of violence" means a statement or course of conduct that 02 recklessly places a person in fear of physical injury or death; 03 (5) "victim counseling center" has the meaning given in AS 18.66.250; 04 (6) "violence" means a crime under AS 11.41 that injures a person or 05 places a person in fear of physical injury or death. 06 * Sec. 10. AS 18.66.100(f) is amended to read: 07 (f) Within 30 days before, or within 60 days after, the expiration of a 08 protective order issued or extended under (b)(2) of this section, a petitioner may 09 petition the court for an extension of the protective order. The court shall schedule a 10 hearing and provide at least 10 days' notice to the respondent of the hearing and of the 11 respondent's right to appear and be heard, either in person or through an attorney. If 12 the court finds that an extension of the provisions of the order is necessary to protect 13 the petitioner from domestic violence, regardless of whether the respondent appears at 14 the hearing, the court may extend the provisions of the order. An extension granted 15 under this subsection is effective for at least one year and not more than five years 16 unless earlier dissolved by court order. If the court grants an extension before the 17 protective order expires, the extension takes effect on the day the protective order 18 would have expired. 19 * Sec. 11. AS 18.66.150 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 20 (e) Attorney fees may not be awarded against a petitioner seeking a protective 21 order under AS 18.66.100 - 18.66.180. 22 * Sec. 12. AS 22.15.100 is amended to read: 23 Sec. 22.15.100. Functions and powers of district judge and magistrate. 24 Each district judge and magistrate has the power 25 (1) to issue writs of habeas corpus for the purpose of inquiring into the 26 cause of restraint of liberty, returnable before a judge of the superior court, and the 27 same proceedings shall be had on the writ as if it had been granted by the superior 28 court judge under the laws of the state in those cases; 29 (2) of a notary public; 30 (3) to solemnize marriages; 31 (4) to issue warrants of arrest, summons, and search warrants 01 according to manner and procedure prescribed by law and the supreme court; 02 (5) to act as an examining judge or magistrate in preliminary 03 examinations in criminal proceedings; to set, receive, and forfeit bail and to order the 04 release of defendants under bail; 05 (6) to act as a referee in matters and actions referred to the judge or 06 magistrate by the superior court, with all powers conferred on [UPON] referees by 07 laws; 08 (7) of the superior court in all respects including contempts, attendance 09 of witnesses, and bench warrants; 10 (8) to order the temporary detention of a minor, or take other action 11 authorized by law or rules of procedure, in cases arising under AS 47.10 or AS 47.12, 12 when the minor is in a condition or surrounding dangerous or injurious to the welfare 13 of the minor or others that requires immediate action; the action may be continued in 14 effect until reviewed by the superior court in accordance with rules of procedure 15 governing these cases; 16 (9) to issue a protective order in cases involving 17 (A) domestic violence as provided in AS 18.66.100 - 18 18.66.180; [OR] 19 (B) stalking or sexual assault as provided in AS 18.65.850 - 20 18.65.870; or 21 (C) violence related to a victim counseling center as 22 provided in AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899; 23 (10) to review an administrative revocation of a person's driver's 24 license or nonresident privilege to drive, and an administrative refusal to issue an 25 original license, when designated as a hearing officer by the commissioner of 26 administration and with the consent of the administrative director of the Alaska Court 27 System; 28 (11) to establish the fact of death or inquire into the death of a person 29 in the manner prescribed under AS 09.55.020 - 09.55.069; 30 (12) to issue an ex parte testing, examination, or screening order 31 according to the manner and procedure prescribed by AS 18.15.375. 01 * Sec. 13. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 02 read: 03 INDIRECT COURT RULE AMENDMENTS. (a) AS 18.65.895, added by sec. 9 of 04 this Act, has the effect of amending Rule 4, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, and Rule 9, 05 Alaska Rules of Administration, relating to fees and service of process for a victim counseling 06 center protective order. 07 (b) AS 18.65.875 - 18.65.899, added by sec. 9 of this Act, have the effect of 08 amending Rule 65, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, by changing the method for obtaining 09 and the timing of temporary restraining orders. 10 * Sec. 14. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 11 read: 12 APPLICABILITY. AS 18.65.850(f), as amended by sec. 7 of this Act, and 13 AS 18.66.100(f), as amended by sec. 10 of this Act, apply to protective orders issued before, 14 on, or after the effective date of this Act. 15 * Sec. 15. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 16 read: 17 CONDITIONAL EFFECT. This Act takes effect only if sec. 13 of this Act receives 18 the two-thirds majority vote of each house required by art. IV, sec. 15, Constitution of the 19 State of Alaska. 20 * Sec. 16. If this Act takes effect under sec. 15 of this Act, it takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.